Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1483.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; department of administration; Navajo technical university; environmental testing laboratory; exemption A. The sum of $8,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the Navajo technical university to survey, design, plan and construct an environmental testing laboratory, including any interior build-out or specialized equipment needed. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.